Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1720
Sheriff; deputies; indemnification; legal counsel.

Any sheriff, deputy state sheriff, deputy sheriff, or special deputy sheriff required to be bonded under section 11-119 or 23-1704.01 shall be indemnified by the county employing such sheriff, deputy state sheriff, deputy sheriff, or special deputy sheriff should such person become liable to any surety on a bond written under either such section. Any sheriff, deputy state sheriff, deputy sheriff, or special deputy sheriff may, with the approval of the county board, retain his or her own legal counsel to represent him or her in such proceedings at county expense.

Laws 1969, c. 143, § 1, p. 664;

Laws 1990, LB 821, § 9.